Delaware, session 153, HB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2707, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2707. Payment of vouchers upon approval; method of payment. (a) All vouchers for the payment of money issued by any department, commission or board of the State, including those requiring the approval of the Governor, shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon the certification by the proper officers of the department, commission or board and the approval thereof by the Secretary of Finance. Methods of payments may include checks, drafts and electronic funds transfers. (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Office of the State Treasurer shall make payments to vendors for goods or services provided to any department, commission, or board of the State via direct deposit (ACH Payment), Single Use Account (SUA Payment), or the Stateâs Procurement Card (PCARD Payment) only, unless an exception is approved by the Office of the State Treasurer and the Division of Accounting. This section does not apply to single payment vouchers, one-time suppliers, forced payouts conducted at year end by the Division of Accounting, or legal settlements.